Washington statutes.
RCW 19.126.080

Civil actions—Injunctive relief.

A person injured by a violation of this chapter, other than a person seeking only a determination of the compensation due to a terminated distributor under RCW 19.126.040(4), may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations. Injunctive relief may be granted in an action brought under this chapter without the injured party being required to post bond if, in the opinion of the court, there exists a likelihood that the injured party will prevail on the merits.

[ 2009 c 155 s 5; 1985 c 440 s 3.]